Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202543-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-3301 to 43-3325 shall be known and may be cited as the License Suspension Act.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 27;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 6.